Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-150
Kearney.

The county of Kearney is bounded on the north by the middle of the south channel of the Platte River; on the east, by the line dividing ranges twelve and thirteen, west; on the south, by the first standard parallel; on the west by the line dividing ranges sixteen and seventeen, west.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 31, p. 218;

R.S.1913, § 863;

C.S.1922, § 765;

C.S.1929, § 25-152;

R.S.1943, § 22-150.